src-fst-morphology-stems-numerals.lexc.md
# Meadow & Eastern Mari numerals 

## The initial lexica

* **LEXICON Numeral**  initial lexica

* **LEXICON ARABIC** arabic numerals

* **LEXICON ARABICLOOP**

* **LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD_Back** ordinals

* **LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD_Front** ordinals

* **LEXICON ARABICLOOPORD_FrontRound** ordinals

* **LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERORD_Back** ordinals

* **LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERORD_Front** ordinals

* **LEXICON ARABICDELIMITERORD_FrontRound** ordinals

The Roman numerals !
------------------ !

* **LEXICON ROMAN**  roman numerals

* **LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND**

* **LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND-TAG**

* **LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED**

* **LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED-TAG**

* **LEXICON ROM-TEN**

* **LEXICON ROM-TEN-TAG**

* **LEXICON ROM-ONE**

* **LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG**

* **LEXICON ROM-SPLIT**

* **LEXICON 2ROMAN**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-TEN**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-ONE**

* **LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG**

* **LEXICON ROMNUMTAG**

* **LEXICON ARABICCASEORD_Back** ordinals Is this then becoming +Ex/A?
* **LEXICON ARABICCASEORD_Front** ordinals
* **LEXICON ARABICCASEORD_FrontRound** ordinals

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mhr/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc)</small>

---
